Utah statutes.
63G-6-503.   Definitions -- Procurement of tollway development agreements.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Department" means the Department of Transportation.
(b)  "Tollway development agreement" has the same meaning as defined in
Section 72-6-202.
(2)  The department and the Transportation Commission:
(a)  may solicit a tollway development agreement proposal by following the
requirements of this section;
(b)  may award a solicited tollway development agreement contract for any
tollway project by following the requirements of this section; and
(c)  shall make rules, by following the procedures and requirements of Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing requirements
for the procurement of tollway development agreement proposals in addition to
those required by this section.
(3) (a)  Before entering into a tollway development agreement, the department
may issue a request for qualifications to prequalify potential contractors.
(b)  Public notice of the request for qualifications shall be given in
accordance with policy board rules.
(c)  The department shall require, as part of the qualifications specified in
the request for qualifications, that potential contractors at least provide:
(i)  a demonstration of their experience with other transportation concession
projects with attributes similar to the project being procured;
(ii)  a financial statement of the firm or consortium of firms making the
proposal;
(iii)  a conceptual project development plan and financing plan;
(iv)  the legal structure of the firm or consortium of firms making the
proposal;
(v)  the organizational structure for the project; and
(vi)  a statement describing why the firm or consortium of firms is best
qualified for the project.
(d)  The request for qualifications shall identify the number of eligible
competing proposers that the department will select to submit a proposal.
(4)  The department shall:
(a)  evaluate the responses received from the request for qualifications;
(b)  select from their number those qualified to submit proposals; and
(c)  invite those respondents to submit proposals based upon the department's
request for proposals.
(5)  The department shall issue a request for proposals to those qualified
respondents that may require, as appropriate for the procurement:
(a)  a description of the proposed project or projects;
(b)  a financial plan for the project, including:
(i)  the anticipated financial commitment of all parties;
(ii)  equity, debt, and other financing mechanisms;
(iii)  an analysis of the projected return, rate of return, or both; and
(iv)  the monetary benefit and other value to a government entity;
(c)  assumptions about user fees or toll rates;
(d)  a project development and management plan, including:
(i)  the contracting structure;
(ii)  the plan for quality management;
(iii)  the proposed toll enforcement plan; and
(iv)  the plan for safety management; and
(e)  the proposal to comply with the minimum guidelines for tollway
development agreement proposals under Section 72-6-204.
(6)  The department and the Transportation Commission:
(a)  shall evaluate the submissions received in response to the request for
proposals from the prequalified proposers;
(b)  shall comply with rules relating to discussion of proposals, best and
final offers, and evaluations of the proposals submitted; and
(c)  may after considering price and other identified factors and complying
with the requirements of Section 72-6-206, award the contract to the
responsible proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the state.
